Illinois, session 104th, HB3631.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5adding Section 21 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3105/21 new)7    Sec. 21. Payment to subcontractors. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that: 9        (1) Subcontractors performing work on State-funded 10    projects are essential to the completion of public 11    construction. 12        (2) Delays in payments from prime contractors to 13    subcontractors adversely affect the financial stability of 14    subcontractors and disrupt project timelines. 15        (3) Allowing the Capital Development Board to pay 16    subcontractors directly under specific circumstances 17    promotes fair payment practices and ensures the timely 18    completion of public projects. 19    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 20Capital Development Board may issue direct payment to 21subcontractors for work performed on State-funded projects 22under the following conditions:23        (1) the subcontractor has submitted an affidavit and   HB3631- 2 -LRB104 11420 HLH 21508 b1    supporting documentation verifying the amount due for work 2    performed, including a copy of the subcontract agreement 3    and evidence of work completion (e.g., invoices, progress 4    reports, or certifications of completed work);5        (2) the prime contractor has failed to pay the 6    subcontractor within 30 days after the prime contractor 7    receives payment from the Board; and8        (3) the subcontractor has provided written notice of 9    non-payment to the Capital Development Board and the prime 10    contractor, allowing the prime contractor a 10-day 11    response period.12    (c) Upon receiving a valid claim from a subcontractor, the 13Capital Development Board shall notify the prime contractor 14and allow the prime contractor to dispute the claim within 10 15business days. If no dispute or justification is provided by 16the prime contractor, or if the justification is deemed 17invalid by the Board, the Board shall remit payment directly 18to the subcontractor for the amount verified as due.19    (d) Any payment made by the Capital Development Board to a 20subcontractor under this Section shall be deducted from future 21payments owed to the prime contractor.22    (e) A prime contractor who fails to pay subcontractors in 23compliance with this Act shall be subject to penalties, 24including but not limited to, a 10% withholding on future 25payments and suspension or disqualification from bidding on 26future State contracts for up to 3 years.  HB3631- 3 -LRB104 11420 HLH 21508 b1    (f) The Board shall adopt rules for implementing this 2Section, including procedures for submitting claims, verifying 3documentation, and resolving disputes. 4    Section 10. The State Prompt Payment Act is amended by 5adding Section 12 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 540/12 new)7    Sec. 12. Payment rights of subcontractors. 8    (a) Subcontractors working on State-funded projects 9managed by the Capital Development Board may submit claims for 10direct payment under the conditions outlined in Section 21 of 11the Capital Development Board Act.12    (b) Any interest penalties due for late payments under 13this Act shall apply to payments owed to subcontractors.